Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF332.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1243YH (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 332 Section 1. Section 256.146, subsection 13, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . f. The board may suspend the license of an 3 administrator upon the boardâs finding by a preponderance of 4 the evidence that the administrator violated section 279.87. 5 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 279.87 Administrators ââ teaching 6 requirements. 7 1. Each school district containing two or more high schools, 8 three or more middle schools, or four or more elementary 9 schools shall do all of the following: 10 a. Require all administrators who are employed by the 11 school district as a superintendent, assistant superintendent, 12 or school district department head to teach at least one 13 one-semester class, or the trimester or quarter equivalent, at 14 least once every three years. 15 b. Require all administrators who are employed by the school 16 district as a high school principal or middle school principal 17 to teach at least three one-semester classes, or the trimester 18 or quarter equivalent, at least once every three years. 19 c. Require all administrators who are employed by the school 20 district as an elementary school principal to teach at least 21 two subject areas in an elementary school class for at least 22 one semester, or the trimester or quarter equivalent, at least 23 once every three years. 24 d. Require all administrators who are employed by the school 25 district as a high school or middle school assistant principal, 26 director of athletics, dean of students, or any similar 27 position to teach at least three one-semester classes, or the 28 trimester or quarter equivalent, at least once every two years. 29 e. Require all administrators who are employed by the school 30 district as an elementary school assistant principal, dean of 31 students, or any similar position to teach at least two subject 32 areas in an elementary school class for at least one semester, 33 or the trimester or quarter equivalent, at least once every two 34 years. 35 -1- LSB 1243YH (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 6 H.F. 332 2. Each school district containing one high school, at 1 least one but not more than two middle schools, or at least one 2 but not more than three elementary schools shall do all of the 3 following: 4 a. Require all administrators who are employed by the school 5 district as a superintendent or assistant superintendent to 6 teach at least one one-semester class, or the trimester or 7 quarter equivalent, at least once every three years. 8 b. Require all administrators who are employed by the school 9 district as an administrator in a high school or middle school, 10 and who are not described in paragraph âaâ , âcâ , âdâ , or âeâ , to 11 teach at least three one-semester classes, or the trimester or 12 quarter equivalent, at least once every three years. 13 c. Require all administrators who are employed by the school 14 district as an administrator in an elementary school, and who 15 are not described in paragraph âaâ , âbâ , âdâ , or âeâ , to teach 16 at least two subject areas in an elementary school class for at 17 least one semester, or the trimester or quarter equivalent, at 18 least once every three years. 19 d. Require all administrators who are employed by the school 20 district as a high school or middle school assistant principal, 21 director of athletics, dean of students, or any similar 22 position to teach at least two one-semester classes, or the 23 trimester or quarter equivalent, at least once every two years. 24 e. Require all administrators who are employed by the school 25 district as an elementary school assistant principal, dean of 26 students, or any similar position to teach at least two subject 27 areas in an elementary school class for at least one semester, 28 or the trimester or quarter equivalent, at least once every two 29 years. 30 3. Each school district containing one middle school, one 31 elementary school, or no high schools shall do all of the 32 following: 33 a. Require all administrators who are employed by the school 34 district as a superintendent or assistant superintendent to 35 -2- LSB 1243YH (2) 91 jda/jh 2/ 6 H.F. 332 teach at least one one-semester class, or the trimester or 1 quarter equivalent, at least once every three years. 2 b. Require all administrators who are employed by the school 3 district as an administrator in a high school or middle school, 4 and who are not described in paragraph âaâ or âcâ , to teach at 5 least three one-semester classes, or the trimester or quarter 6 equivalent, at least once every three years. 7 c. Require all administrators who are employed by the school 8 district as an administrator in an elementary school, and who 9 are not described in paragraph âaâ or âbâ , to teach at least two 10 subject areas in an elementary school class for at least one 11 semester, or the trimester or quarter equivalent, at least once 12 every three years. 13 4. If more than one of subsections 1, 2, and 3 apply 14 to a school district, the school district shall meet the 15 requirements of subsection 2 in order to comply with this 16 section. 17 5. The superintendent of each school district shall ensure 18 that administrators employed by the school district comply 19 with this section. The superintendent of each school district 20 shall report to the department of education on an annual basis 21 regarding the school districtâs compliance with this section. 22 6. If the board of directors of a school district finds 23 that an administrator employed by the school district failed to 24 comply with this section, the administrator shall be subject 25 to a hearing conducted by the board of educational examiners 26 pursuant to section 256.146, subsection 13, which may result 27 in disciplinary action, including the suspension of the 28 administratorâs license. 29 7. An administrator providing instruction pursuant to 30 this section shall hold a valid license issued by the board 31 of educational examiners with an endorsement for the type of 32 instruction provided by the administrator. 33 8. A school district that employs an administrator 34 who is jointly employed by another school district as an 35 -3- LSB 1243YH (2) 91 jda/jh 3/ 6 H.F. 332 administrator under section 280.15 shall be in compliance 1 with the requirements of this section if the school district 2 ensures that the administrator complies with the applicable 3 requirements of this section for at least one of the school 4 districts that employ the administrator. 5 9. For purposes of this section, âadministratorâ means the 6 same as defined in section 256.145. 7